Utah statutes.
53-10-111.   Refusal to provide information -- False information -- Misdemeanor.

It is a class B misdemeanor for a person to:

(1)  neglect or refuse to provide, or willfully withhold any information under this part;

(2)  willfully provide false information;

(3)  willfully fail to do or perform any act required under this part;

(4)  hinder or prevent another from doing an act required under this part; or

(5)  willfully remove, destroy, alter, mutilate, or disclose the contents of any file or record created or maintained, or to which access is granted by the division unless authorized by and in compliance with procedures established by the division.

